Hawaii statutes.
[§667-51] Appeals. (a) Without
limiting the class of orders not specified in section 641-1 from which appeals
may also be taken, the following orders entered in a foreclosure case shall be
final and appealable:

(1) A judgment entered on a decree of foreclosure,
and if the judgment incorporates an order of sale or an adjudication of a
movant's right to a deficiency judgment, or both, then the order of sale or the
adjudication of liability for the deficiency judgment also shall be deemed
final and appealable;

(2) A judgment entered on an order confirming the
sale of the foreclosed property, if the circuit court expressly finds that no
just reason for delay exists, and certifies the judgment as final pursuant to
rule 54(b) of the Hawaii rules of civil procedure; and

(3) A deficiency judgment; provided that no appeal
from a deficiency judgment shall raise issues relating to the judgment debtor's
liability for the deficiency judgment (as opposed to the amount of the
deficiency judgment), nor shall the appeal affect the finality of the transfer
of title to the foreclosed property pursuant to the order confirming sale.

(b) An appeal shall be taken in the manner and
within the time provided by the rules of court. [L 2003, c 89, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next